Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-301
Act, how cited.

Sections 9-301 to 9-356 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Pickle Card Lottery Act.

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 67;

Laws 1988, LB 1232, § 4;

Laws 1991, LB 795, § 1;

Laws 1994, LB 694, § 62;

Laws 1996, LB 1277, § 2;

Laws 2002, LB 545, § 21.